Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2005
Photodegradable, defined.

Photodegradable shall mean degradable through a process in which ultraviolet radiation in sunlight causes a chemical change in a material.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 5.